Massachusetts, session 194th, S1045.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 210 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section 13, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 13. (a) The court shall, before decreeing a change of name, request a report from
the commissioner of probation on the person filing the petition and, upon entry of a decree, the
name as established thereby shall be the legal name of the petitioner, and the register may issue a
certificate, under the seal of the court, of the name as so established.
No decree shall be entered, however, until there has been filed in the court a copy of the
birth record of the person whose name is sought to be changed and, in case such person's name
has previously been changed by decree of court or at marriage pursuant to section 1D of chapter
46, either a copy of the record of such person’s birth amended to conform to the previous decree
changing the person’s name, a copy of such decree or a copy of the record of marriage; provided,
of 2

that the filing of any such copy may be dispensed with if the judge is satisfied that it cannot be
obtained.
(b) The court shall, at the request of the person whose name is sought to be changed,
order that the petition for name change, all pleadings, papers or documents filed in connection
therewith, docket entries in the permanent docket and record books shall not be available for
inspection if the court finds that an open record of the person's name change would jeopardize
such person's safety based on the totality of the circumstances. Upon such a finding, the
petitions, reports, pleadings, papers, documents and permanent docket and record books shall be
segregated. A separate permanent docket book shall be provided for all such segregated entries.
This section shall apply to the index of the court of all such segregated entries, a separate index
of which shall be provided.
For the purposes of this section, "totality of the circumstances" shall include, but not be
limited to, a consideration of the risk of violence or discrimination against the person, including
the person’s gender non-conformity or status as transgender or as a survivor of domestic
violence.
The court shall not deny such request to segregate solely on the basis that the person
lacks specific instances of or a personal history of threats to their personal safety.
of 2